Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.3, as
last amended by Section 85, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.3. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons wishing to demonstrate support, interest or membership to or
for an organization, occupation, cause or other subject as provided
by this section.

Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special
license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information
and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon
presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant's
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The licensed operator fees for
acceptance of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1,
2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and
renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 2

If fewer than one hundred of any type of special license plates
authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,
2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of
that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special
license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license
plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration
date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be
removed from the vehicle.
Except as otherwise provided in law, for special license plates
authorized on or after July 1, 2004, no special license plates shall
be developed or issued by Service Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma
receives one hundred (100) prepaid applications therefor. The
prepaid applications must be received by Service Oklahoma within one
hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the authorization
or the authority to issue shall be null and void. In the event one
hundred (100) prepaid applications are not received by Service
Oklahoma within such prescribed time period any payment so received
shall be refunded accordingly.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Round and Square Dance License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
round and square dancing;
2. National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
License Plate - such plates shall be designed, subject to the
criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by the NAACP, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the NAACP;
3. National Rifle Association License Plate - such plates shall
be designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the National Rifle Association, and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the National Rifle Association;
4. Masonic Fraternity License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
a Masonic Fraternity of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a
Masonic Fraternity license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Masonic
Fraternity membership or upon the presentment of an application for
a Masonic Fraternity license plate authorized and approved by the
Grand Lodge of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 3

consultation with the Masonic Fraternities of Oklahoma and shall
contain the Masonic emblem;
5. Shriners Hospitals for Children License Plate - such plates
shall be designed to demonstrate support for Shriners Hospitals for
Children and shall be issued to any resident of this state who is a
member of a Shriners Temple in Oklahoma. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Shriners Temples in Oklahoma and
shall contain the Shriners emblem;
6. Balloonists License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for hot air
ballooning in this state;
7. Order of the Eastern Star License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member
of an Order of the Eastern Star. Such persons may apply for an
Order of the Eastern Star license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an
Order of the Eastern Star membership or upon the presentment of an
application for an Order of the Eastern Star license plate
authorized and approved by the organization. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the Order of the Eastern Star
and shall contain the Order of the Eastern Star emblem;
8. Knights of Columbus License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Knights of Columbus. Such persons may apply for a Knights of
Columbus license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Knights of Columbus
membership or upon the presentment of an application for a Knights
of Columbus license plate authorized and approved by the
organization. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Knights of Columbus and shall contain the Knights of
Columbus emblem;
9. Jaycees License Plate - such plates shall be designed and
issued to members of the Jaycees. Persons applying for such license
plate must show proof of membership in the Jaycees. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Jaycees;
10. Kiwanis International License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to members of Kiwanis International. Persons
applying for such license plate must show proof of membership in
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 4

Kiwanis International. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Kiwanis International;
11. Certified Public Accountants License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a
Certified Public Accountant. Such persons may apply for a Certified
Public Accountant license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of status as a
Certified Public Accountant. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of Certified Public
Accountants;
12. Civil Emergency Management License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate
support for the state civil emergency management system. Persons
applying for such license plate must show proof of official
affiliation by presenting a nonexpired proof of employment,
affiliation or retirement in the form of an identification card or
letter on official letterhead from a municipal, county or state
emergency management department head;
13. Civilian Conservation Corps License Plate – such plates
shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma, by the Civilian Conservation Corps Association, and issued
to any person wishing to demonstrate support of the Civilian
Conservation Corps;
14. Rotarian License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any resident of this state who is a member of a Rotary
Club of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a Rotarian license
plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less upon proof of a Rotary Club membership or upon the
presentment of an application for a Rotarian license plate
authorized and approved by a Rotary Club of Oklahoma. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the five Rotarian
District Governors and shall contain the Rotarian emblem;
15. Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks License Plate –
such plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented
to Service Oklahoma, by the Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks,
and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of the
Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks;
16. Humane Society License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 5

the Humane Society of the United States. The plates shall be issued
to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to
a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate
shall contain the official Humane Society logo;
17. Oklahoma Mustang Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,
by the Oklahoma Mustang Club, and issued to any resident of this
state who is a member of the Oklahoma Mustang Club. Such persons
may apply for an Oklahoma Mustang Club license plate upon
presentment of proof of membership in the Oklahoma Mustang Club.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates;
18. American Business Clubs (AMBUCS) License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to members of American Business
Clubs. Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of
membership in AMBUCS. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with American Business Clubs;
19. West Point 200th Anniversary License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate
the Two Hundredth Anniversary of the founding of the United States
Military Academy at West Point, New York. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the West Point Society of Central
Oklahoma;
20. Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma Aquarium. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Aquarium. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate
is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
21. The Pride of Broken Arrow License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for The Pride of Broken Arrow marching band. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Broken Arrow Public School System;
22. Fellowship of Christian Athletes License Plate - such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Fellowship of
Christian Athletes and issued to members and supporters of the
Fellowship of Christian Athletes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 6

23. Parrothead Club License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to members and supporters of the Parrothead
Club. The license plate shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven as
for personalized license plates;
24. Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of the
Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition;
25. Electric Lineman License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Oklahoma's electric linemen. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Electric Superintendent's
Association;
26. Alpha Kappa Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Kappa
Alpha Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Kappa Alpha
Sorority;
27. The National Pan-Hellenic Council Incorporated License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support to any of the nine sororities and
fraternities recognized by the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated;
28. Organ, Eye and Tissue License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support and
increase awareness for organ, eye and tissue donation. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the State Department
of Health;
29. Central Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support and increase awareness for Habitat for Humanity.
The license plate shall be designed in consultation with Central
Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity;
30. Family Career and Community Leaders of America Incorporated
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 7

wishing to demonstrate support for Family Career and Community
Leaders of America Incorporated. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Family Career and Community Leaders of
America Incorporated;
31. Delta Sigma Theta License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Delta Sigma
Theta Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Delta Sigma Theta Sorority
Incorporated;
32. Omega Psi Phi License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person who is a member of Omega Psi Phi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Omega Psi Phi Fraternity Incorporated;
33. Alpha Phi Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Phi Alpha
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity
Incorporated;
34. 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System of Highways
License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
wishing to commemorate the 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System
of Highways. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the American Association of State Highway and Transportation
Officials;
35. Kappa Alpha Psi License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Kappa Alpha Psi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity
Incorporated;
36. Sigma Gamma Rho License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Sigma Gamma Rho
Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Chapter of Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority Incorporated.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sigma
Gamma Rho License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,
2013;
37. Multiple Sclerosis License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 8

and increase awareness of multiple sclerosis. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the
National Multiple Sclerosis Society;
38. Frederick A. Douglass High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for Frederick A. Douglass High School located in
Oklahoma City. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Frederick A. Douglass High School National Alumni
Association;
39. United States Air Force Academy License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the United States Air Force Academy;
40. In God We Trust License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the motto, "In God We Trust", and shall be
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the motto;
41. National Weather Center License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the National Weather Center in Norman. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the National
Weather Center Directors;
42. Make-A-Wish Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Make-A-Wish Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Make-A-Wish
Foundation;
43. South Central Section of the PGA Foundation License Plate -
such plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support for the South Central Section of the PGA
Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the South Central Section of the PGA Foundation;
44. Putnam City High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Putnam City High School. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of Putnam City High School Alumni
Association, Inc.;
45. Autism Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 9

autism. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Autism Network;
46. Oklahoma Blood Institute License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Oklahoma Blood Institute. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Blood Institute;
47. Zeta Phi Beta and Phi Beta Sigma License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of
Zeta Phi Beta Sorority or Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma chapters
of Zeta Phi Beta Sorority Incorporated and Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity
Incorporated;
48. Star Spencer High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Star Spencer High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates
shall be designed in consultation with representatives of the Star
Spencer High School Alumni Association. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Star Spencer High School
License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;
49. Northeast High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Northeast High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Northeast High
School Alumni Association;
50. Oklahoma City Central High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association;
51. Oklahoma Rifle Association License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Rifle Association. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Oklahoma Rifle
Association;
52. Oklahoma City Thunder License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 10

the Oklahoma City Thunder. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma City Thunder organization;
53. Ovarian Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness
of ovarian cancer. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the HOPE in Oklahoma organization;
54. BMW Car Club of America License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the BMW Car Club of America. The plates shall be issued to any
person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the Sunbelt Chapter of
the BMW Car Club of America. Subject to the provisions of
subsection A of this section, the BMW Car Club of America License
Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2013;
55. Don't Tread On Me License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the yellow background and rattlesnake emblem
above the motto "DON'T TREAD ON ME" as found on the historic Gadsden
flag, and shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the freedom and liberty of the Republic;
56. Oklahomans for the Arts License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for arts, culture and creative industries as well as arts education.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahomans for the
Arts;
57. Tulsa Oilers License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa Oilers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Tulsa Oilers organization;
58. Tulsa Drillers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Tulsa Drillers. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Tulsa Drillers organization;
59. Millwood School District License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Millwood School District. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood School
District;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 11

60. Booker T. Washington High School License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Booker T. Washington High School and shall be designed in
consultation with the Booker T. Washington High School National
Alumni Association;
61. Oklahoma Current State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the current Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the current
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center;
62. Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the original Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the original
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center. The plates shall
be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters
from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate is hereby reauthorized
effective November 1, 2015;
63. Tulsa 66ers License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa 66ers. The plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Tulsa 66ers Organization;
64. Frederick Bombers License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Frederick
School District and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Frederick School District;
65. 911 Dispatcher License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to persons wishing to demonstrate support for 911 dispatchers.
Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of current
employment as a 911 dispatcher or sign an attestation that they are
a currently employed or retired 911 dispatcher;
66. Oklahoma Fosters License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
Fosters Initiative and shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma Fosters Initiative;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 12

67. Red Dirt Jeep License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Red Dirt
Jeep and such plates shall be designed in consultation with Red Dirt
Jeep, L.L.C.;
68. Sons of the American Revolution License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the
Sons of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Sons of the
American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of
similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the
space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
69. Daughters of the American Revolution License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Daughters of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Daughters
of the American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may
be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to
meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
70. Air Medal License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to Air Medal recipients. An individual requesting the
license plate is required, at the time of application, to show proof
he or she is a recipient of the Air Medal or sign an attestation
stating that he or she is a medal recipient. The plates shall be
designed to include the Air Medal emblem and shall include the words
"Air Medal" on the plate;
71. Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate is hereby
reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 13

72. The Pride of Oklahoma Marching Band License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. The
plates shall be designed in consultation with the University of
Oklahoma;
73. The Spirit of Oklahoma State Marching Band License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Spirit of Oklahoma State marching band.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahoma State
University;
74. Southeast Spartans License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Southeast High School Spartans and such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association;
75. Catoosa High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Catoosa High School located in Catoosa. The plates shall bear the
image of the Catoosa High School mascot and be designed in
consultation with representatives of Catoosa High School;
76. Toastmasters International License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Toastmasters International and shall be designed in consultation
with District 16 of Toastmasters International;
77. Millwood High School Alumni License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Millwood High School Alumni. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood High
School Alumni Association;
78. Patriot Guard Riders License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for Patriot Guard
Riders and shall be designed in consultation with the Patriot Guard
Riders of Oklahoma;
79. Bixby School District License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Bixby School District. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of the Bixby School District;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 14

80. Oklahoma Renewable Energy License Plate – such plates shall
be designed in consultation with the Advanced Power Alliance and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for renewable
energy;
81. Scottish Rite Masons License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Scottish Rite Masons. Such persons may apply for a Scottish
Rite Masons license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Scottish Rite
membership. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Scottish Rite Masons in Oklahoma and shall contain the
Scottish Rite emblem;
82. New State Brand License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the new
Oklahoma brand. The license plates shall contain the new state
brand;
83. Tulsa Flag License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the City
of Tulsa. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Tulsa Community Foundation;
84. ROAD License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Recovering
Oklahomans After Disaster. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Recovering Oklahomans After Disaster
organization;
85. Tulsa Icon License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa community for a vehicle or motorcycle in a pre-numbered format
or any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
six for vehicles or one to a maximum of five for motorcycles, as for
personalized plates. The plate design for vehicles will include
Tulsa's iconic Golden Driller and Route 66 Rising sculpture. The
license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space
permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a
motorcycle license plate;
86. ORA License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 15

Rifle Association. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Rifle Association;
87. Hallett Motor Racing Circuit License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Hallett Motor Racing Circuit. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Hallett Motor Racing
Circuit;
88. University of Kansas License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Kansas. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Kansas and/or the University of
Kansas Alumni Association; and
89. Clinton Red Tornadoes License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Clinton Red Tornadoes. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Clinton Public School System; and
90. Tulsa Air and Space Museum and Planetarium License Plate -
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Tulsa Air and Space Museum and
Planetarium. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Tulsa Air and Space Museum and Planetarium.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Fifteen Dollars ($15.00)
per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. Unless otherwise provided in this section, the
fee shall be apportioned as follows: Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year
of renewal of the special license plate fee shall be deposited in
the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for the
administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act
and the remaining Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of renewal of the
special license plate fee shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight
Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the special license plate fee
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund to be
used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act and the remaining Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of
renewal of the special license plate fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 16

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.5, as
last amended by Section 92, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.5. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons wishing to demonstrate support and provide financial
assistance as provided by this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year with a licensed operator.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special
license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information
and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon
presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant's
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 17

registration of a motor vehicle through June 30, 2025. Through June
30, 2025, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications
and renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund. Beginning July 1, 2023, fees shall not be retained by the
licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this
title.
If fewer than fifty (50) of any type of special license plates
authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,
2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of
that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special
license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license
plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration
date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be
removed from the vehicle.
For special license plates authorized on or after July 1, 2004,
no special license plates shall be developed or issued by Service
Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma receives one hundred prepaid
applications therefor. The prepaid applications must be received by
Service Oklahoma within one hundred eighty (180) days of the
effective date of the authorization or the authority to issue shall
be null and void. In the event one hundred prepaid applications are
not received by Service Oklahoma within such prescribed time period
any payment so received shall be refunded accordingly.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. University or College Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support to any state-supported or private university or college. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1104.1 of this title;
2. Environmental Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Department of Environmental Quality in consultation
with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support to implement the statewide general public
Environmental Education Program created pursuant to the provisions
of the Oklahoma Environmental Quality Code. Such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person in any combination of numbers and
letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license
plates. A dealer's license plate issued pursuant to Section 1116.1
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 18

or 1128 of this title may be designated an Environmental Awareness
License Plate upon payment of the fee imposed by this section and
any other registration fees required by the Oklahoma Vehicle License
and Registration Act. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be apportioned pursuant to Section 1104.2 of
this title;
3. Firefighter License Plate - such plates shall be designed
for any career or retired firefighter, volunteer or paid.
Firefighters may apply for firefighter plates for up to four
vehicles with a rated capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a
motorcycle upon proof of a fire department membership by either an
identification card or letter from the chief of the fire department.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any
deceased firefighter, if the spouse has not since remarried, may
apply for a firefighter license plate for one vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a motorcycle upon
proof that the deceased firefighter was a member of a fire
department by either an identification card or letter from the chief
of the fire department. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma State Firefighters Association.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be deposited to the Oklahoma State Firemen's Museum Building &
Memorial Fund for support of the Oklahoma State Firefighters Museum
and the Oklahoma Fallen and Living Firefighters Memorial;
4. Wildlife Conservation License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Department of Wildlife Conservation in consultation
with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for wildlife conservation in this state through
the Wildlife Diversity Fund, provided for in Section 3-310 of Title
29 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Such plates may be designed and issued
to any person as for personalized license plates.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be apportioned pursuant to subsection D of Section 3-310 of
Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Child Abuse Prevention License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 19

Department of Health and the Child Abuse Prevention Action
Committee, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the prevention of child abuse.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be deposited in the Child Abuse Prevention Fund;
6. United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee Supporter
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support for the United States Olympic
and Paralympic Committee. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain
the official United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the United States Olympic and Paralympic
Committee for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment not
more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each license plate
issued;
7. Oklahoma History License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate interest in
Oklahoma history. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited to the Oklahoma Historical Society
Revolving Fund to be used for educational purposes;
8. Historic Route 66 License Plate - such:
a. vehicle plates shall be designed to honor historic
Route 66, also known as the "Mother Road". As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected for each vehicle license plate shall be
apportioned to the Oklahoma Historical Society
Revolving Fund to be distributed to the Route 66
Museum located in Clinton, Oklahoma, and
b. motorcycle plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,
Inc., for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc.,
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 20

for a payment to the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,
Inc., of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each motorcycle license plate issued;
9. Heart of the Heartland License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to honor the victims of
the terrorist bombing attack on the Alfred P. Murrah Federal
Building in downtown Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Heart of the Heartland Scholarship Fund, as established in
Section 2282 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Emergency Medical Technician License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who is an emergency
medical technician. Such persons may apply for an emergency medical
technician license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an emergency medical
technician's license. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians
Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be apportioned to the Emergency Medical Personnel
Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Fight Breast Cancer License Plate - such plates shall be
designed to demonstrate support for the prevention and treatment of
breast cancer in this state;
12. Crime Victims Awareness License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
awareness of and support for victims of crimes. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Crime Victims
Compensation Program. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be apportioned to the Attorney General's
Revolving Fund for the Office of the Attorney General, which is
hereby directed to use such funds to contract with a statewide
nonprofit organization to provide services to crime victims;
13. Safe Kids Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support and
awareness of Safe Kids Oklahoma. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Safe Kids Oklahoma. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Children's Hospital - Safe Kids Oklahoma Revolving Fund to be
distributed to Safe Kids Oklahoma program;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 21

14. Oklahoma Four-H Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the Four-H Foundation, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support of the Oklahoma Four-H Club. Such plates may be
designed and issued to any person as for personalized license
plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be apportioned to the OSU Extension Service License Plate
Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.4 of this title;
15. Agricultural Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,
by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in
consultation with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support of the Department's Ag in the
Classroom Education Program. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section
1104.3 of this title;
16. Oklahoma Statehood Centennial License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate
the centennial of Oklahoma's admission to statehood in 1907. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Capitol Complex and Centennial Commemoration Commission. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma Department of Commerce Revolving Fund
created in Section 5012 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Support Education License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the State Department of Education in consultation with the Oklahoma
Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for education in this state. All licensed operators shall
display a sample of the Support Education License plate in the area
of the business accessed by the public. Twenty-three Dollars
($23.00) of the fee collected shall be apportioned as follows:
a. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Education
Reform Revolving Fund,
b. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education Revolving Fund,
c. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the State
Career-Technology Fund, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 22

d. eighty-five percent (85%) shall be deposited to the
Teachers' Retirement Benefit Fund as set forth in
Section 17-108 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
However, when the Teachers' Retirement Benefit Fund attains a
seventy percent (70%) funded ratio based on an annual actuarial
valuation as required by law, the amount of the fee shall be
apportioned equally pursuant to subparagraphs a, b and c of this
paragraph;
18. Retired Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any retired officer of
the Oklahoma Highway Patrol. The license plate shall have the
legend "Oklahoma" and shall contain, in the center of the plate, the
Highway Patrol Officers patch using the same colors and pattern as
used in the patch. Centered on the bottom of the license plate
shall be the word "Retired". The letters "TRP" shall be used in
combination with three numbers on either side of the insignia or
emblem. The color of the letters and numbers shall be brown.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any
deceased retired officer of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, if the
spouse has not since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is
terminated by death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a Retired
Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers license plate. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited into the
Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement Fund;
19. Boy Scouts of America Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Boy Scouts of America. The plates shall be issued
to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to
a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate
shall contain the official Boy Scouts of America logo. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Boy Scouts of America for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Boy Scouts of America
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment
to the Boy Scouts of America of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued;
20. Urban Forestry and Beautification License Plate – such
plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 23

Service Oklahoma, by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,
and Forestry in consultation with nonprofit organizations in this
state that develop and operate programs to encourage urban forestry
and beautification, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support of such programs. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1104.5
of this title;
21. Oklahoma State Parks Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
state parks system. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department Revolving Fund. Such money shall be designated for and
may only be expended for the support of Oklahoma state parks;
22. Adoption Creates Families License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support of pregnant
women who are committed to placing their children for adoption and
wishing to provide assistance to guardians, adoptive parents and
other created families to assist in the adoption and placement of
children in permanent, safe homes. The license plates shall be
designed and final terminology delivered in consultation with the
Oklahoma Adoption Coalition and the Department of Human Services.
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee collected shall be deposited
in a revolving fund established in the State Treasury for and to be
used by the Department of Human Services for the implementation of
the Investing in Stronger Oklahoma Families Act specifically for
created families;
23. Choose Life License Plate – such plates shall be designed,
subject to criteria presented to Service Oklahoma, by Choose Life
America, Inc., and issued to any person who wishes to demonstrate
support of organizations that encourage adoption as a positive
choice for women with unplanned pregnancies. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Choose Life Assistance Program Revolving Fund established in Section
1104.6 of this title;
24. Future Farmers of America License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma FFA Association (formerly known as Future Farmers of
America). The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma FFA Association Board of Directors. As provided in
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 24

this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104.7 of this title;
25. Lions Club License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Lions
Clubs of Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation
and shall contain the official logo of the International Association
of Lions Clubs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation.
The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma
Lions Service Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for
each license plate issued;
26. Color Oklahoma License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the Oklahoma Native Plant Society, and issued to any person wishing
to demonstrate support for preserving and planting wildflowers and
native plants in this state and to promote Oklahoma's wildflower
heritage through education. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section
1104.8 of this title;
27. Girl Scouts of the United States of America Supporter
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support for the Girl Scouts of the
United States of America. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain
the official Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Girl Scouts of the United States of
America for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Magic Empire
Council of Girl Scouts, acting on behalf of all Oklahoma Girl Scout
councils, of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
28. Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon. The plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 25

Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Oklahoma City
Memorial Marathon logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
29. Oklahoma Scenic Rivers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to demonstrate support for the Grand River Dam Authority.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Scenic Rivers operations of the Grand River Dam Authority. Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee shall be apportioned to the Grand
River Dam Authority for the purposes of the Oklahoma Scenic Rivers
operations;
30. Fight Cancer License Plate – such plates shall be designed
to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry.
The plate shall contain the American Cancer Society logo. The
American Cancer Society logo shall be used in accordance with the
American Cancer Society's branding guidelines and shall only be
utilized to support the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry. Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) of the fee shall be apportioned to the Oklahoma
Central Cancer Registry Revolving Fund;
31. Animal Friendly License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
controlling the overpopulation of dogs and cats through educational
and sterilization efforts. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Veterinary Medical Association. Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be designated by the
purchaser of the plate to be deposited in the Oklahoma Pet
Overpopulation Fund created in Section 2368.13 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes or the Animal Friendly Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.10 of this title;
32. Patriot License Plate - such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Oklahoma
residents who are members of the Oklahoma National Guard and
deployed on active duty. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided in this
section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Patriot License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.11 of
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 26

33. Global War on Terrorism License Plate - such plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Military Department of the State
of Oklahoma and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Oklahoma residents who are members of the Armed Forces of the
United States or Oklahoma National Guard that have served in the
Global War on Terrorism. The plate shall be issued to any person in
any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in
Section 235.1 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Boys and Girls Clubs of America Supporter License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Boys and Girls Clubs of America. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. The plate shall contain the official Boys and Girls
Clubs of America logo. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter
into a licensing agreement with the Boys and Girls Clubs of America
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Boys and Girls Clubs of America logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Boys and Girls Clubs of
America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
35. Oklahoma Quarter Horse License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the American Quarter Horse in this state. The plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Quarter Horse
Association. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Quarter Horse Revolving
Fund created in Section 1104.12 of this title;
36. Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License Plate – such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Association for the Deaf and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for Oklahoma residents who are deaf. The plates
shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and
letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license
plates. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected
shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License
Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.15 of this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 27

37. Oklahoma City Zoo License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
City Zoo. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Zoological Society, Inc. As provided in this section,
an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma
Zoological Society Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.13 of this
title;
38. March of Dimes License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the March of Dimes
mission to improve the health of babies by preventing birth defects,
premature birth and infant mortality. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter March of Dimes.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma Prevent Birth Defects, Premature Birth and
Infant Mortality Fund established in Section 1104.14 of this title;
39. Support Our Troops Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Support Our Troops Incorporated. The plates shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of six. The plate shall contain the official
Support Our Troops Incorporated logo which includes the mark
"Support Our Troops" across the bottom of the plate. Service
Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with
Support Our Troops Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the Support Our Troops Incorporated logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Support Our Troops Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for
each license plate issued;
40. Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate – such plates shall
be authorized to be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor
Incorporated, a nonprofit charitable organization exempt from
taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), providing educational scholarships to
spouses and children of America's fallen and disabled military
service members. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
Such person may apply for a Folds of Honor Supporter license plate
for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be
of similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be
a new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate. The plate shall be designed in consultation with the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 28

Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor Incorporated and shall
contain the official Folds of Honor Incorporated logo which includes
the mark "Folds of Honor" across the bottom of the plate. Service
Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with
Folds of Honor Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the Folds of Honor Incorporated logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Folds of Honor Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each
license plate issued. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of
this section, the Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate is hereby
reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;
41. Armed Forces Veterans Motorcycle License Plate – such
plates shall be designed for use on a motorcycle in consultation
with A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma, Inc.
(ABATE), and issued to any honorably discharged former member of the
United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma National Guard Museum. Persons applying for such license
plate must show proof of past military service. As provided in this
section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in Section 235.1 of
Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Buffalo Soldier License Plate - such plates shall be issued
to any person wishing to honor and celebrate the history and
contribution of the Buffalo Soldiers. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Lawton-Fort Sill Chapter of the
Buffalo Soldiers 9th and 10th (Horse) Cavalry Association. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Buffalo Soldier License Plate Revolving Fund
created in Section 1104.16 of this title;
43. Prevent Blindness Oklahoma License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for vision screening of school age children in this state. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with Prevent
Blindness Oklahoma. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be deposited in the Prevent Blindness Oklahoma
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.17 of this
title;
44. Oklahoma State Capitol Restoration License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for restoration of the Oklahoma State Capitol
building. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 29

the Friends of the Capitol corporation, created pursuant to Section
15.4 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and the State Capitol
Preservation Commission created pursuant to Section 4102 of Title 74
of the Oklahoma Statutes. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Friends of the
Capitol License Plate Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.18
of this title;
45. Eastern Red Cedar Tree License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
removal of Eastern Redcedar trees from lands in the state and to
develop marketable uses for the harvested trees. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Eastern Redcedar
Revolving Fund created in Section 18-407 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The money shall be designated for and may only be
expended for the purposes as set forth in the Eastern Redcedar
Management Act;
46. Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer
Research Fund. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer Research Fund.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate Revolving
Fund created in Section 1104.19 of this title;
47. Alzheimer's Research License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Oklahoma Chapter of the Alzheimer's Association. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the
Alzheimer's Association. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Alzheimer's Research
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.20 of this
title;
48. Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Hospice and Palliative Care Association. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 30

Hospice and Palliative Care Association. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.21 of this title;
49. Juvenile Diabetes Research License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research
Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research
Foundation. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Juvenile Diabetes Research
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.22 of this
title;
50. Deer Creek Schools Foundation License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Deer Creek Schools Foundation. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Deer Creek Schools Foundation.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Deer Creek Schools
Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.23
of this title;
51. Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma Lupus License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.24 of this title. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of
this section, the Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate is
hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2018;
52. Chiefs of Police License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of Police for a vehicle or motorcycle
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs
of Police. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar
design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the space
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 31

requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma shall
be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma
Association of Chiefs of Police for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the association's logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma
Association of Chiefs of Police of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Chiefs of Police License Plate
is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;
53. Crossings Christian School License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Crossings Christian School located in Oklahoma City.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
administration of Crossings Christian School. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with
Crossings Christian School for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the school's logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Crossings Christian
School of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
54. Hilldale Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Hilldale Education Foundation. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the
Hilldale Education Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized
to enter into a licensing agreement with the Hilldale Education
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Hilldale Education Foundation of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
55. Oklahoma Nurses License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to any person licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act
and providing such documentation of current licensure as may be
required by Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Nurses Association. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Oklahoma Nurses License Plate Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.26 of this title;
56. Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame. The license plates shall be designed
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 32

in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma Sports Hall
of Fame. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Hall of
Fame's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a
payment to the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
57. Childhood Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma Children's Cancer Association. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma
Children's Cancer Association. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized
to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Children's
Cancer Association for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the Oklahoma Children's Cancer Association's logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Oklahoma Children's Cancer Association of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
58. Oklahoma Educational Television Authority License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Educational Television
Authority and such plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Authority. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in The Educational Television Authority
Revolving Fund created in Section 156 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
59. Remembering Fallen Heroes License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Concerns of Police Survivors, Inc. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Concerns of
Police Survivors, Inc. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Concerns of
Police Survivors License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.27 of this title;
60. Disabled American Veterans License Plate – such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Disabled American
Veterans of Oklahoma and issued to any member of the organization
wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Disabled
American Veterans of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the organization's logo or design. The
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 33

licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Disabled
American Veterans of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued. The plates shall
incorporate a numbering system agreed upon by the Disabled American
Veterans of Oklahoma and Service Oklahoma;
61. Owasso Rams Supporter License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Owasso Rams, and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Owasso Public Schools. The plates shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section
34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Collinsville Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Collinsville Cardinals, and shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of Collinsville Public
Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an
amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education
Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Sperry Pirates Supporter License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Sperry Pirates, and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Sperry Schools. The plates shall be issued to
any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of
Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Skiatook Bulldogs Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Skiatook Bulldogs, and shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of Skiatook Public Schools. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 34

collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund
created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
65. Rejoice Christian Eagles Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Rejoice Christian Eagles, and shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of Rejoice Christian
Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an
amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education
Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
66. East Central Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the East Central Cardinals, and shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of East Central High
School. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination
of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform
Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
67. Southeast Spartans Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Southeast Spartans, and shall be designed in
consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund
created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. Sooner State ABATE License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for Sooner
State ABATE (A Brotherhood Against Totalitarian Enactments). The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with Sooner State
ABATE. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination
of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of
similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the
space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Sooner
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 35

State ABATE for any licensing fees, which may be required in order
to use the association's logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to Sooner State ABATE of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to
the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sooner State
ABATE License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,
2019;
69. Oklahoma License to Educate License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Oklahoma educators. Such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the State Department of Education. As provided in
this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in
the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Revolving Fund created in Section
6-132 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
70. Piedmont Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation. Such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Foundation. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.28 of this
title;
71. The Pride of Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Pride of Oklahoma marching band and shall be designed in
consultation with the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the University of Oklahoma or the Pride of Oklahoma marching
band for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the applicable logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Pride of Oklahoma Fund at the
University of Oklahoma Foundation, Inc. of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
72. Jenks Trojans License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Jenks school district. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Jenks school district.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Jenks school district for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the school district's logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 36

Jenks school district not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
73. Bixby Spartans License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Bixby school district. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Bixby school district.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Bixby school district for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the school district's logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Bixby school district not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
74. Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics License
Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma aviation industry
and to promote awareness of aviation and aerospace. Such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Aerospace and Aeronautics and shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Department of
Aerospace and Aeronautics Revolving Fund, for expenditure as
provided in Section 91 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
75. Ducks Unlimited License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Ducks Unlimited. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with
Ducks Unlimited. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
a licensing agreement with Ducks Unlimited for any licensing fee
which may be required in order to use the Ducks Unlimited logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Ducks Unlimited of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
76. Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate - such
plates shall be issued to any person wishing to increase awareness
of those who are currently prisoners of war or missing in action and
provide financial support for current veterans. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Rolling Thunder Oklahoma. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate
Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.29 of this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 37

77. Woodward Boomers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Woodward school district. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the administration of the Woodward school
district. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Woodward school district for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the school
district's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Woodward school district not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
78. Clinton Public School Foundation License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Clinton Public School Foundation. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Clinton
Public School Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Clinton Public School
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the school foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Clinton Public School Foundation
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued;
79. Navajo School Foundation License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Navajo School Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Navajo School
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Navajo School Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Navajo School Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
80. Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate – such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Music
Hall of Fame Inc. and issued to any member of the organization
wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma
Music Hall of Fame Inc. for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the organization's logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Music Hall of
Fame Inc. of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued. The plates shall incorporate a numbering system
agreed upon by the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. and Service
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 38

Oklahoma. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this
section, the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate is
hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;
81. Techlahoma Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Techlahoma Foundation. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Techlahoma Foundation. The plate shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Techlahoma Foundation for any licensing fees,
which may be required in order to use the association's logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Techlahoma Foundation of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
82. Bethany Public Schools Foundation License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Bethany Public Schools Foundation. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the administration of the Bethany
Public Schools Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Bethany Public Schools
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the Foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Bethany Public Schools Foundation of
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
83. Cystic Fibrosis Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Cystic Fibrosis
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
84. Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma License Plate
- such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Down Syndrome Association of Central
Oklahoma. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Down Syndrome Association of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 39

Central Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.30 of this title;
85. Elk City Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Elk City Education Foundation. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Foundation. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Elk City Education Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created
in Section 1104.31 of this title;
86. A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma (ABATE)
License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any
person wishing to provide financial support for ABATE of Oklahoma.
Such plates shall be designed in consultation with ABATE of
Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may
be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to
meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with ABATE of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the ABATE of Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to ABATE of Oklahoma of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
87. Downed Bikers Association License Plate - such plates shall
be designed for a vehicle or motorcycle in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Downed Bikers Association, a nonprofit
charitable organization exempt from taxation pursuant to the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(3), which provides emotional and financial support for downed
bikers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Central Oklahoma Chapter of the Downed Bikers Association and
shall contain any official logo or design of the organization. The
license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space
permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a
motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter
into a licensing agreement with the Downed Bikers Association for
any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Downed Bikers Association of not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 40

88. Eagle Scout License Plate – such plates shall be designed
to demonstrate support for Eagle Scouts of the Boy Scouts of America
and shall include the Eagle Scout logo. Plates may be issued to any
person who can show proof of having obtained the rank of Eagle
Scout. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the various Oklahoma local councils for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the applicable
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued to the specific Oklahoma local area council designated by the
applicant;
89. Extraordinary Educators License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial
support for common education in this state. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the State Department of Education.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Extraordinary
Educators License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.32 of
this title;
90. Former Oklahoma Legislator License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who previously served as
a member of the House of Representatives or Senate. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Historical Society. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Historical Society
Capital Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund created in Section
1.10a of Title 53 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Service Oklahoma shall
create and maintain a list of former members of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives and Oklahoma State Senate eligible to be issued
such plates; provided, that no former member of the House of
Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to possess more than
two of such plates at any one time. Service Oklahoma shall confer
as needed with the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and
the Secretary of the Senate to confirm that such list is complete
and accurate;
91. Monarch Butterfly License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the operations of The Nature Conservancy of Oklahoma. Such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of The
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 41

Nature Conservancy. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a licensing agreement with The Nature Conservancy of Oklahoma
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
foundation's logo or design. The plates shall be issued to any
person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to The Nature Conservancy of
Oklahoma not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
92. Oklahoma Tennis Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Tennis
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
foundation's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
93. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars License Plate - such
plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign
Wars Chapters and shall be issued to any resident of this state upon
proof of membership in the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
organization. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued. Service Oklahoma shall reinstate any Veterans
of Foreign Wars license plates issued prior to November 1, 2021, and
shall reimburse any individual who held a Veterans of Foreign Wars
License Plate on October 31, 2021, for fees incurred for the
replacement of such plate;
94. Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any female veteran of any
branch of the United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Women
Veterans Organization. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 42

enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Women Veterans
Organization for any licensing fees which may be required in order
to use the organization's logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Women Veterans
Organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
95. FIRST (For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and
Technology) in Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be issued
to any person wishing to demonstrate support for FIRST in Oklahoma
Robotics programs. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of FIRST in Oklahoma. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with FIRST in Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the FIRST in Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to FIRST in Oklahoma not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
96. Pittsburg State University License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Pittsburg State University. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Pittsburg State University.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with Pittsburg State University for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the school foundation's logo
or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
the Pittsburg State University of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued;
97. Greenwood Historical District License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa Juneteenth Festival held in the Greenwood Historical District
in Tulsa, Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Black Wall Street Chamber of
Commerce. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Festival's
logo or design. For each license plate issued, the licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment of Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00) of the fee collected to the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival and
an additional Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Public School Classroom Support Revolving Fund, for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 43

expenditure as provided in Section 1-123 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
98. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters
License Plate - such plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters and issued to any
resident of this state upon proof of membership in the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization in this state. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the
Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
Auxiliary organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
99. Transportation to Transportation License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to support
county roads and bridges. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Association of County Commissioners of
Oklahoma. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be
paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the license
plate was purchased to be credited to the county highway fund
created pursuant to Section 1503 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
100. Blue Star Mothers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person showing proof of membership in an
Oklahoma Chapter of Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with Blue Star Mothers of
America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Blue Star
Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Blue Star Mothers of
America logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a
payment to Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
101. Oklahoma Golf License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the sport of golf in this state. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the South Central Section of the
Professional Golfers' Association of America and issued to any
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 44

person wishing to demonstrate support for the sport of golf in this
state. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the South Central Section of the
Professional Golfers' Association of America for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the organization's logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
South Central Section of the Professional Golfers' Association of
America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
102. Paramedic License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person who is a paramedic. Such persons may apply
for a paramedic license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less or a motorcycle upon proof of a
paramedic license. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma State University-Oklahoma City
Paramedicine program and the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians
Association. The letters "PM" shall be placed on the plate followed
by four random numbers, or such numbers as requested by such persons
applying for the plate. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fees
collected shall be deposited in the Emergency Medical Personnel
Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes. Subject to the provisions of subsection A
of this section, the Paramedic License Plate is hereby reauthorized
effective November 1, 2022;
103. National Defense Service Medal License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to those persons who have received the
National Defense Service Medal and wish to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the Department's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued;
104. University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any past or present member of
the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS upon providing proof of
membership in the organization as may be required by Service
Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS. Service Oklahoma shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 45

authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the University
of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the organization's logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Mike James RUF/NEKS
Memorial Scholarship of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
105. Tulsa Community College License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to persons wishing to support Tulsa Community College.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Tulsa Community
College. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with Tulsa Community College for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the organization's logo
or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Tulsa Community College of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
106. Street Kings Car Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Street Kings Car Club in Guthrie. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Street Kings Car Club. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the Street Kings Car Club for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the organization's logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Street Kings
Car Club not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
107. Epilepsy Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Epilepsy Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Epilepsy Foundation of Oklahoma. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into licensing agreements with
the Epilepsy Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the organization's logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Epilepsy Foundation of
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
108. America First License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the proclamation of "America First". The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Warriors for Freedom and the Honoring
America's Warriors Foundations. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into licensing agreements with the Warriors for
Freedom and Honoring America's Warriors Foundations for any
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 46

licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundations' logos or designs. The licensing agreements shall
provide for a payment to the Honoring America's Warriors Foundation
of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) and a payment to the Warriors
for Freedom Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for
each license plate issued;
109. Diabetes Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial
support for Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Diabetes Solutions of
Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
licensing agreements with Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Diabetes
Solutions of Oklahoma logos or designs. The licensing agreements
shall provide for a deposit to the Diabetes Awareness License Plate
Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.33 of this title;
110. Alliance of Mental Health Providers of Oklahoma License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the Alliance of Mental Health
Providers of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of
Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
licensing agreements with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of
Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the organization's logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Alliance of Mental Health
Providers of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
111. Stillwater Public Schools License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Stillwater school district. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the
Stillwater school district. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Stillwater school district
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
school district's logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Stillwater school district of not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued; and
112. Ally's House License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to those persons who live in Oklahoma, have had a child
diagnosed with a form of cancer and wish to demonstrate support for
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 47

Ally's House. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with Ally's House. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a license agreement with Ally's House for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the Ally's House logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Ally's House of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
113. The Church Studio License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
The Church Studio. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with The Church Studio. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with The Church
Studio for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
The Church Studio logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to The Church Studio of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
114. Star Spencer High School License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Star Spencer High School. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with Star Spencer High School. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Star
Spencer High School for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the Star Spencer High School logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to Star Spencer High
School of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued; and
115. Ralph Ellison Foundation License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Ralph Ellison Foundation. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Ralph Ellison Foundation. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the Ralph Ellison Foundation for any licensing fees which may
be required in order to use the Ralph Ellison Foundation logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Ralph Ellison Foundation of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00)
for each license plate issued.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Thirty-five Dollars
($35.00) per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. The fee shall be apportioned as follows through
June 30, 2023:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 48

1. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per year of renewal or any other
amount as provided in this title of the fee shall be apportioned as
provided or deposited in a fund as specified within the paragraph
authorizing the special license plate;
2. Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the fee shall
be deposited in the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for
the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration
Act. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of
renewal of the fee shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma
Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act; and
3. Any remaining amounts of the fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 49

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1487 Page 50